California, session 20252026, AB766.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11816 of the Government Code is amended to read:11816. (a) Each agency, department, office, or commission subject to the Governor’s authority shall develop a strategic plan and shall report to the Governor and to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by April 1, 2026, and by each April 1 thereafter on the steps being taken to develop and adopt a strategic plan.(b) The report required by subdivision (a) shall include a description of the elements to be included in the strategic plan, the process for developing and adopting the strategic plan, a timetable for the plan’s completion, and an identification of the steps being taken to develop performance measures that could be used for a performance budgeting system or a performance review.(c) In developing its strategic plan, each agency, department, office, or commission shall consult with, at minimum, employee organizations, the Legislature, client groups served, suppliers, and contractors.SEC. 2. Section 11818 is added to the Government Code, to read:11818. Every agency, department, office, or commission subject to the Governor’s authority shall, for any strategic plans applicable and if feasible, develop or update, as applicable, the strategic plan to reflect the use of data analysis and inclusive practices to more effectively advance racial equity and to respond to identified disparities with changes to the organization’s mission, vision, goals, data tools, policies, programs, operations, community engagement, tribal consultation policies and practices, and any other actions as necessary to serve all Californians.